Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0695, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For deleted text begin purposedeleted text end new text begin purposesnew text end of this section, the following terms have the meanings given them. new text begin (b) "Credit certificate" means the certificate issued by the commissioner of transportation under subdivision 3, paragraph (a). new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end "Eligible taxpayer" means any railroad that is classified by the United States Surface Transportation Board as a Class II or Class III railroad. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end "Eligible transferee" means any taxpayer subject to tax under this chapter or chapter 297I. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end "Qualified railroad reconstruction or replacement expenditures" means gross expenditures in the taxable year for maintenance, reconstruction, or replacement of railroad infrastructure, including track, roadbed, bridges, industrial leads and sidings, and track-related structures owned or leased by a Class II or Class III railroad in Minnesota as of January 1, 2021. Qualified railroad reconstruction or replacement expenditures also includes new construction of industrial leads, switches, spurs and sidings and extensions of existing sidings in Minnesota by a Class II or Class III railroad. new text begin (f) "Transfer credit certificate" means the certificate issued to a transferee by the commissioner under subdivision 3, paragraph (d). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2022. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0695, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. deleted text begin Transferabilitydeleted text end new text begin Credit certificatesnew text end ; written agreement required; deleted text begin credit certificatedeleted text end new text begin transferabilitynew text end . (a) new text begin To qualify for a credit under this section, an eligible taxpayer must apply to the commissioner of transportation for a credit certificate. The application for the credit certificate must be in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner of transportation, in consultation with the commissioner. If the application is approved, the commissioner of transportation must issue the credit certificate to the eligible taxpayer within 30 days of receipt of the application. The credit certificate must state, at a minimum, the number of miles of qualified railroad reconstruction or replacement expenditures in the taxable year and the total amount of credit calculated under the provisions of subdivision 2, paragraph (a). The commissioner of transportation must provide a copy of the credit certificate to the commissioner of revenue. The commissioner of transportation must not issue more than one credit certificate to an eligible taxpayer in a taxable year.new text end new text begin (b) By written agreement, new text end an eligible taxpayer may transfer the credit allowed under this section deleted text begin by written agreementdeleted text end to an eligible transfereedeleted text begin . The amount of the transferred credit is limited to the unused, remaining portion of the creditdeleted text end new text begin as follows:new text end new text begin (1) any amount of the credit allowed that is stated in the credit certificate before any of the credit is claimed; or new text end new text begin (2) the entire amount of the credit carryover in each of the five succeeding taxable yearsnew text end . deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The eligible taxpayer and the eligible transferee must jointly file a copy of the written transfer agreement with the commissioner within 30 days of the transfer. The written agreement must contain the name, address, and taxpayer identification number of the parties to the transfer; the taxable year the eligible taxpayer incurred the qualified expenditures; the amount of credit being transferred; and the taxable year or years for which the transferred credit may be claimed. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The commissioner must issue a new text begin transfer new text end credit certificate to the transferee within 30 days of the joint filing of a copy of the written transfer agreement with the commissioner. deleted text begin (d) In the case of an audit or assessment, the transferee is liable for repayment of credits claimed in excess of the allowed amount. deleted text end new text begin (e) An eligible taxpayer must not transfer a credit to an eligible transferee more than once in a taxable year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2022. new text end